Georgia statutes. TITLE 3 Alcoholic Beverages
PART 3 Exemptions

3-5-90.
Malt beverages containing less than one-half of 1 percent alcohol by volume.

Malt beverages which contain less than one-half of 1 percent alcohol by volume shall not be subject to any tax levied under this title or any tax levied pursuant to authority granted by this title.

History.

Code 1981, §

3-5-90

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 562, § 1.